Idaho, session 2025, H0224.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-512, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-512. GOVERNANCE OF SCHOOLS. The board of trustees of each school
district shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To fix the days of the year and the hours of the day when schools
shall be in session. However:
(a) Each school district shall annually adopt and implement a school
calendar that provides its students at each grade level with the follow-
ing minimum number of instructional hours:
Grades Hours
9-12 990
4-8 900
1-3 810
K 450
Alternative schools
(any grades) 900
(b) School assemblies, testing and other instructionally related ac-
tivities involving students directly may be included in the required
instructional hours.
(c) When approved by a local school board, annual instructional hour
requirements stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be reduced
as follows:
(i) Up to a total of twenty-two (22) hours to accommodate staff
development activities conducted on such days as the local school
board deems appropriate.
(ii) Up to a total of eleven (11) hours of emergency school clo-
sures due to adverse weather conditions and facility failures.
However, transportation to and from school, passing times between
classes, recess and lunch periods shall not be included.
(d) Student and staff activities related to the opening and closing of
the school year, grade reporting, program planning, staff meetings, and
other classroom and building management activities shall not be counted
as instructional time or in the reductions provided in paragraph (c)(i)
of this subsection.


(e) For multiple shift programs, this rule applies to each shift (i.e.,
each student must have access to the minimum annual required hours of
instruction).
(f) The instructional time requirement for grade 12 students may be re-
duced by action of a local school board for an amount of time not to ex-
ceed eleven (11) hours of instructional time.
(g) The state superintendent of public instruction may grant an ex-
emption from the provisions of this section for an individual building
within a district, when the closure of that building, for unforeseen
circumstances, does not affect the attendance of other buildings within
the district.
(h) The state board of education may grant a waiver of the minimum
number of instructional hours for a school district when districtwide
school closures are necessary as a result of natural occurrences cre-
ating unsafe conditions for students. A county or state disaster
declaration must have been issued for one (1) or more of the counties
in which the school district is located. A waiver request to the state
board of education must describe the efforts by the school district to
make up lost instructional hours, the range of grades impacted, and the
number of hours the school district is requesting be waived.
(i) The reduction of instructional hours allowed in paragraphs (f)
through (h) of this subsection may not be combined in a single school
year.
(2) To adopt and carry on and to provide for the financing of a total ed-
ucational program for the district. Such programs in other than elementary
school districts may include education programs for out-of-school youth and
adults, and such districts may provide classes in kindergarten;
(3) To provide, or require pupils to be provided with, suitable text-
books and supplies and, for advice on textbook selections, may appoint a cur-
ricular materials adoption committee as provided in section 33-512A, Idaho
Code;
(4) To protect the morals and health of the pupils;
(5) To exclude from school children not of school age;
(6) To prescribe rules for the disciplining of unruly or insubordinate
pupils, including rules on student harassment, intimidation and bullying,
such rules to be included in a district discipline code adopted by the board
of trustees and a summarized version thereof to be provided in writing at the
beginning of each school year to the teachers and students in the district
in a manner consistent with the student's age, grade and level of academic
achievement;
(7) To exclude from school pupils with contagious or infectious dis-
eases who are diagnosed or suspected as having a contagious or infectious
disease or those who are not immune and have been exposed to a contagious or
infectious disease; and to close school if the board determines that condi-
tions warrant such closure, based on consultation with the district health
department of the public health district in which the school district is lo-
cated;
(8) To equip and maintain a suitable library or libraries in the school
or schools and to exclude therefrom, and from the schools, all books, tracts,
papers, and catechisms of sectarian nature;


(9) To determine school holidays. Any listing of school holidays shall
include not less than the following: New Year's Day, Memorial Day, Indepen-
dence Day, Thanksgiving Day, and Christmas Day. Other days listed in section
73-108, Idaho Code, if the same shall fall on a school day, shall be observed
with appropriate ceremonies; and any days the state board of education may
designate, following the proclamation by the governor, shall be school holi-
days;
(10) To erect and maintain on each schoolhouse or school grounds a suit-
able flagstaff or flagpole and display thereon the flag of the United States
of America on all days, except during inclement weather, when the school is
in session; and for each Veterans Day, each school in session shall conduct
and observe an appropriate program of at least one (1) class period remember-
ing and honoring American veterans;
(11) To prohibit entrance to each schoolhouse or school grounds, to pro-
hibit loitering in schoolhouses or on school grounds and to provide for the
removal from each schoolhouse or school grounds of any individual or indi-
viduals who disrupt the educational processes or whose presence is detrimen-
tal to the morals, health, safety, academic learning or discipline of the
pupils. A person who disrupts the educational process or whose presence is
detrimental to the morals, health, safety, academic learning or discipline
of the pupils, or who loiters in schoolhouses or on school grounds, is guilty
of a misdemeanor;
(12) To supervise and regulate, including by contract with established
entities, those extracurricular activities that are by definition outside
of or in addition to the regular academic courses or curriculum of a public
school, and which extracurricular activities shall not be considered to be a
property, liberty or contract right of any student, and such extracurricular
activities shall not be deemed a necessary element of a public school educa-
tion but shall be considered to be a privilege. For the purposes of extracur-
ricular activities, any secondary school located in this state that is ac-
credited by an organization approved through a process defined by the state
department of education shall be able to fully participate in all extracur-
ricular activities described in and governed by the provisions of this sub-
section;
(13) To govern the school district in compliance with state law and
rules of the state board of education;
(14) To submit to the superintendent of public instruction not later
than July 1 of each year documentation that meets the reporting requirements
of the federal gun-free schools act of 1994 as contained within the federal
improving America's schools act of 1994;
(15) To require that all certificated and noncertificated employees
hired on or after July 1, 2008, and other individuals who are required by
the provisions of section 33-130, Idaho Code, to undergo a criminal history
check shall submit a completed ten (10) finger fingerprint card or scan to
the department of education no later than five (5) days following the first
day of employment or unsupervised contact with students in a K-12 setting,
whichever is sooner. Such employees and other individuals shall pay the cost
of the criminal history check. If the criminal history check shows that the
employee has been convicted of a felony crime enumerated in section 33-1208,
Idaho Code, it shall be grounds for immediate termination, dismissal or


other personnel action of the district, except that it shall be the right
of the school district to evaluate whether an individual convicted of one
of these crimes and having been incarcerated for that crime shall be hired.
Provided however, that any individual convicted of any felony offense listed
in section 33-1208(2), Idaho Code, shall not be hired. For the purposes of
criminal history checks, a substitute teacher is any individual who tem-
porarily replaces a certificated classroom educator and is paid a substitute
teacher wage for one (1) day or more during a school year. A substitute
teacher who has undergone a criminal history check at the request of one (1)
district in which he has been employed as a substitute shall not be required
to undergo an additional criminal history check at the request of any other
district in which he is employed as a substitute if the teacher has obtained
a criminal history check within the previous five (5) years. If the district
next employing the substitute still elects to require another criminal his-
tory check within the five (5) year period, that district shall pay the cost
of the criminal history check or reimburse the substitute teacher for such
cost. To remain on the statewide substitute teacher list maintained by the
state department of education, the substitute teacher shall undergo a crimi-
nal history check every five (5) years;
(16) To develop and maintain a safe environment for students and em-
ployees by developing a system that cross-checks all contractors or other
persons who have irregular contact with students against the statewide sex
offender registry by developing a school safety plan for each school and by
meeting annually with emergency first responders to update the plans and
discuss emergency exercises and operations;:
(a) Developing a system of background checks for all persons who have
unsupervised contact with students in a kindergarten through grade 12
setting, which shall include but shall not be limited to a check of the
Idaho sex offender central registry provided in chapter 83, title 18,
Idaho Code;
(b) Requiring each school in the school district to create and maintain
an emergency operations plan for each school that is approved by the
board. The board shall ensure plans are developed in coordination with
local school staff and local emergency response agencies and reviewed
at least annually for updates and changes. Plans shall meet the guide-
lines adopted by the Idaho school safety and security advisory board;
and
(c) Requiring all school district staff to receive initial and an-
nual emergency operations training that provides instruction on how to
conduct exercises in order to respond to emergencies according to the
guidelines established by the Idaho school safety and security advisory
board; and
(17) To provide support for teachers in their first two (2) years in the
profession in the areas of: administrative and supervisory support, mentor-
ing, peer assistance and professional development.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.